Utah statutes.
4-24-9.   Effect of recorded brand or mark -- Transfer -- Reservation of certain brands.

The owner of a recorded brand or mark has a vested property right in it which is transferable by a duly acknowledged instrument; provided, that a transferee has no rights in the brand or mark until the instrument of transfer is recorded with the department. No person however, other than a member of the Ute Indian Tribe has any vested property right in the brand "ID" which is reserved exclusively for use by members of the Ute Indian Tribe on the Uintah and Ouray Reservation and no person other than a member of the Navajo Indian Tribe has any vested right in the brand "- N" (Bar N) which is reserved exclusively for use by members of the Navajo Indian Tribe on the Navajo Indian Reservation so long as it appears on the left shoulder of the animal branded.  The left jaw of cattle is reserved exclusively for use by the department to identify diseased cattle.

